Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-333
Probate, administration, guardianship; subjects of foreign countries interested; notice to consular representative; when required.

Whenever, upon the filing of a petition for probate, administration or guardianship, or thereafter in the administration of any estate, it shall appear that subjects of any foreign country are or may be interested, either as heirs at law, devisees, legatees or otherwise, the county judge shall at once notify by mail the consular representative of such country for Nebraska of the pendency of such administration and of the probable interests of such foreign subjects; Provided, that such consular representative files his address with the county judge. This section shall in no way affect title to real estate.

Laws 1923, c. 42, § 1, p. 157;

C.S.1929, § 30-331;

R.S.1943, § 30-333.